Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.410

Packer's interest in market limited.

It shall be unlawful for a packer to own or control more than a twenty percent interest in any public livestock market, directly or indirectly through stock ownership or control, or otherwise by himself or herself or through his or her agents or employees.

[ 2011 c 336 s 435; 1959 c 107 s 41.]